Maryland, session 2025, HB0243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–3B–13.
(a) Any adult or minor may be adopted under this subtitle.
(b) (1) Any adult may petition a court for adoption.
(2) If a petitioner is married AND THE PROSPECTIVE ADOPTEE IS A
MINOR, the petitioner’s spouse shall join in the petition unless the spouse:
(i) is separated from the petitioner under a circumstance that gives
the petitioner a ground for annulment or divorce;
(ii) is not competent to join in the petition; or
(iii) 1. is a parent of the prospective adoptee; and
– 1 –

Ch. 501 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. has consented to the adoption in accordance with this
subtitle.
(3) IF THE PETITIONER IS MARRIED AND THE PROSPECTIVE ADOPTEE
IS AN ADULT, THE PETITIONER’S SPOUSE MAY JOIN IN THE PETITION.
(c) Before a petition is filed under this subtitle, a petitioner shall move for, and a
court shall order that, a case pending under Subtitle 3 of this title be closed.
(d) If the marital status of a petitioner changes before entry of an order under this
subtitle, the petitioner shall amend the petition accordingly.
5–3B–15.
(a) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ADOPTION OF AN ADULT.
(2) Subsection (b) of this section does not apply to an adoption by a spouse
of the prospective adoptee’s parent or a relative of the prospective adoptee.
(b) A court shall issue a show–cause order that includes advice as to the parent’s
rights to:
(1) have independent counsel; and
(2) receive adoption counseling and guidance.
(c) On issuance of a show–cause order as to a prospective adoptee, a petitioner
shall serve the order:
(1) on each of the prospective adoptee’s living parents who has not
consented to the adoption; and
(2) if the prospective adoptee is at least 10 years old and has not consented
to the adoption, on the prospective adoptee.
(d) Service under this section shall be by:
(1) personal service; or
(2) certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested.
(e) Service under this section shall be attempted at the parent’s last address
known to the petitioner.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 501
(f) (1) If a court is satisfied, by affidavit or testimony, that, after reasonable
efforts in good faith, a petitioner could not identify a parent or could not effect service on a
parent, the court shall order service through notice by publication as to that parent.
(2) Notice under this subsection shall consist of substantially the following
statement:
To: (Father’s name) To: (Mother’s name) To: Unknown parent “You are hereby
notified that an adoption case has been filed in the circuit court for (county name), case no.
(number). All persons who believe themselves to be parents of a (male or female) child born
on (date of birth) in (city, state) to (mother’s and father’s names and dates of birth) shall
file a written response. A copy of the show–cause order may be obtained from the clerk’s
office at (address) and (telephone number). If you do not file a written objection by
(deadline), you will have agreed to the permanent loss of your parental rights to this child.”
(3) Service under this subsection shall be by:
(i) publication at least once in one or more newspapers in general
circulation in the county where the petition is filed or, if different, where the parent’s last
address known to the petitioner is located; and
(ii) posting for at least 30 days on a website of the Department.
(4) The Department may charge a petitioner a reasonable fee to cover the
cost of posting.
5–3B–16.
(a) Except as provided in § 5–3B–27 of this subtitle AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, before ruling on a consensual adoption petition under
[§ 5–3B–20(1)] § 5–3B–20(B)(1) of this subtitle, a court may order a court investigator or
child placement agency to conduct any investigation that the court considers necessary.
(b) [Before] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
BEFORE ruling on a nonconsensual adoption petition under [§§ 5–3B–20(2)] §§
5–3B–20(B)(2) and 5–3B–22 of this subtitle, a court shall order a court investigator or an
appropriate child placement agency to investigate and submit a report that includes
summaries of:
(1) the prospective adoptee’s emotional ties with and feelings toward the
prospective adoptee’s parents, the prospective adoptee’s siblings, and others who may affect
the prospective adoptee’s best interests significantly; and
(2) the prospective adoptee’s adjustment to:
(i) community;
– 3 –

Ch. 501 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) home; and
(iii) school.
(C) IF A PROSPECTIVE ADOPTEE IS AN ADULT, THE COURT MAY ORDER AN
INVESTIGATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) OF THIS SECTION ONLY FOR GOOD
CAUSE SHOWN.
5–3B–20.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ADOPTION OF AN ADULT.
(B) A court may enter an order for adoption only if:
(1) (i) 1. each of the prospective adoptee’s living parents consents:
A. in writing; or
B. by failure to timely file notice of objection after being
served with a show–cause order in accordance with this subtitle;
2. an administrative, executive, or judicial body of a state or
other jurisdiction has granted a governmental unit or person other than a parent the power
to consent to adoption, and the unit or person consents; or
3. parental rights have been terminated in compliance with
the laws of a state or other jurisdiction, as described in § 5–3B–04 of this subtitle; and
(ii) if the prospective adoptee is at least 10 years old, the prospective
adoptee consents; or
(2) in accordance with § 5–3B–22 of this subtitle, the court orders adoption
without consent otherwise required under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –